Arkansas, session 2025, HB1633.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-15-509(c)(1)(B)(iii), concerning the
requirements of a homeschooled student to participate in an interscholastic
activity at a public school, is amended to read as follows:
(iii)(a) A homeschooled student may begin
participating in an interscholastic activity that is an athletic activity at
*TNL239*
03-17-2025 10:17:16 TNL239

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 S3/17/25 HB1633
a public school other than his or her resident school immediately upon being
approved to participate if the homeschooled student is approved to
participate by July 1June 1 of the school year for which the homeschooled
student will be enrolled in grade seven (7), eight (8), nine (9), or ten
(10).
(b) If a homeschooled student is not approved
to participate in an interscholastic activity that is a varsity athletic
activity by June 1 of the school year for which he or she will be enrolled in
grade seven (7), eight (8), nine (9), or ten (10), then the homeschooled
student shall not be eligible to participate in the interscholastic activity
that is a varsity athletic activity at an Arkansas Activities Association
member school for up to three hundred sixty-five (365) days.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-15-509(h), concerning eligibility of
homeschooled students to participate in certain interscholastic activities at
a public school district upon withdrawing from an Arkansas Activities
Association member school, is amended to read as follows:
(h)(1)(A) A student who withdraws from an Arkansas Activities
Association member school and enrolls in a home school shall immediately be
eligible to participate in any interscholastic activity at a the homeschooled
student's resident public school district if the homeschooled student is
approved to participate by June 1 of the school year for which the
homeschooled student will be enrolled in grade seven (7), eight (8), nine
(9), or ten (10).
(B)(i) However, a homeschooled student shall not be
eligible to participate in an interscholastic activity that is a varsity
sport athletic activity in the homeschooled student's resident public school
district if he or she withdrew from an interscholastic activity that is a
varsity sport athletic activity at the resident public school district during
the previous three hundred sixty-five (365) days.
(ii) A homeschooled student who is not eligible to
participate in an interscholastic activity under this subsection may
participate in tryouts, practices, classes, or other endeavors associated
with the interscholastic activity.
(2) A homeschooled student who has not withdrawn from an
Arkansas Activities Association member school may begin participating in an
03-17-2025 10:17:16 TNL239

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 S3/17/25 HB1633
interscholastic activity in a the homeschooled student's resident public
school district immediately upon being approved to participate by the
resident public school district if the homeschooled student is approved to
participate by June 1 of the school year for which the homeschooled student
will be enrolled in grade seven (7), eight (8), nine (9), or ten (10).

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-15-510(e) and (f), concerning eligibility
of homeschooled students to participate in certain interscholastic activities
at a private school upon withdrawing from an Arkansas Activities Association
member school, are amended to read as follows:
(e)(1)(A) A student who withdraws from an Arkansas Activities
Association member school to be homeschooled shall be immediately eligible to
participate in any interscholastic activity in a private school.
(B) However, a homeschooled student shall not be eligible
to participate in an interscholastic activity that is a varsity sport
athletic activity in the a private school if he or she withdrew from an
interscholastic activity that is a varsity sport athletic activity at an
Arkansas Activities Association member school during the previous three
hundred sixty-five (365) days.
(2) A student who has not withdrawn from an Arkansas Activities
Association member school to become homeschooled may begin participating in
an interscholastic activity in a private school immediately upon being
approved to participate if the homeschooled student is approved to
participate by the private school by June 1 of the school year for which the
homeschooled student will be enrolled in grade seven (7), eight (8), nine
(9), or ten (10).
(f)(1) A homeschooled student approved under subsection (b) of this
section to participate in interscholastic activities at a private school may
begin participating in an interscholastic activity that is an athletic
activity immediately upon being if the homeschooled student is approved to
participate by July 1 the private school by June 1 of the school year for
which the homeschooled student will be participating in the interscholastic
activity and enrolled in grade seven (7), eight (8), nine (9), or ten (10).
(2) A homeschooled student approved under subsection (b) of this
section may immediately participate in rehearsals, tryouts, practices,
auditions, classes, or other endeavors associated with the interscholastic
03-17-2025 10:17:16 TNL239

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 S3/17/25 HB1633
activity that is an athletic activity if the homeschooled student meets the
requirements under subdivision (f)(1) of this section.
(3) If an interscholastic activity is not an athletic activity,
a homeschooled student approved under subsection (b) of this section to
participate in interscholastic activities at a private school may begin
participating in the interscholastic activities that are not athletic
activities immediately upon being approved to participate.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 18, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-18-116. Student transfer to nonpublic school — Participation in
extracurricular activity.
(a) A student who transfers to a nonpublic school and is enrolled in
the nonpublic school by June 1 of the school year for which the transfer
student will be enrolled in grade seven (7), eight (8), nine (9), or ten (10)
shall be immediately eligible to participate in an extracurricular activity
that is an athletic activity.
(b) If a transfer student is not enrolled in a nonpublic school by
June 1 of the school year for which he or she will be enrolled in grade seven
(7), eight (8), nine (9), or ten (10), then the transfer student shall not be
eligible to participate in an extracurricular activity that is a varsity
athletic activity for up to three hundred sixty-five (365) days.
(c)(1) A student who transfers to a nonpublic school under this
section shall complete a Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form as
created by the Arkansas Activities Association.
(2) A Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form shall be
completed and filed with the:
(A) Nonpublic school to which the student transfers under
this section; and
(B) Arkansas Activities Association.
(3) Before a student is eligible to participate in an
extracurricular activity at the nonpublic school to which he or she transfers
under this section, the Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form
submitted by the student as required under subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall be signed by:
(A) Either the:
03-17-2025 10:17:16 TNL239

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 S3/17/25 HB1633
(i) Superintendent of the public school district
from which the student is transferring, if the student is transferring from a
public school district; or
(ii) Director of the nonpublic school from which the
student is transferring, if the student is transferring from another
nonpublic school;
(B) The director of the nonpublic school to which the
student transfers; and
(C) The parent, legal guardian, or person standing in loco
parentis to the student.
(4) The individuals under subdivision (c)(3)(A) and (B) of this
section shall sign the Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form unless
there is demonstrable evidence:
(A) Of recruiting by the receiving nonpublic school
personnel; or
(B) The student is transferring to the nonpublic school
solely for athletic purposes.
(5) A Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form shall be used
only for eligibility determination of a student who transfers to a nonpublic
school under this section and is enrolled in the nonpublic school by June 1
before the student enters grades seven through ten (7-10).

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-18-227(m)(2)(D), concerning the
requirement that a student transferring schools under the Arkansas
Opportunity Public School Choice Act complete a Changing Schools/Athletic
Participation form under certain circumstances, is amended to read as
follows:
(D)(i) A Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form
shall be used only for eligibility determination of a student who transfers
to another public school or nonresident school district under this section
and is enrolled in the receiving school district by July 1 June 1 before the
student enters grades seven through twelve (7-12) seven through ten (7-10).
(ii)(a) A student who transfers to another public
school or nonresident school district under this section and is enrolled in
the receiving school or receiving school district by June 1 of the school
year for which the transfer student will be enrolled in grade seven (7),
03-17-2025 10:17:16 TNL239

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 S3/17/25 HB1633
eight (8), nine (9), or ten (10) shall be immediately eligible to participate
in an extracurricular activity that is an athletic activity.
(b) If a transfer student is not enrolled in a
receiving school or receiving school district by June 1 of the school year
for which he or she will be enrolled in grade seven (7), eight (8), nine (9),
or ten (10), then the transfer student shall not be eligible to participate
in an extracurricular activity that is a varsity athletic activity for up to
three hundred sixty-five (365) days.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1904(f)(2)(D), concerning the
requirement that a student transferring schools under the Public School
Choice Act of 2015 complete a Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form
under certain circumstances, is amended to read as follows:
(D)(i) A Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form
shall be used only for eligibility determination of a student who transfers
to another public school or nonresident school district under this subchapter
and is enrolled in the receiving school district by July 1June 1 before the
student enters grades seven through twelve (7-12) seven through ten (7-10).
(ii)(a) A student who transfers to another public
school or nonresident school district under this section and is enrolled in
the receiving school or receiving school district by June 1 of the school
year for which the transfer student will be enrolled in grade seven (7),
eight (8), nine (9), or ten (10) shall be immediately eligible to participate
in an extracurricular activity that is an athletic activity.
(b) If a transfer student is not enrolled in a
receiving school or receiving school district by June 1 of the school year
for which he or she will be enrolled in grade seven (7), eight (8), nine (9),
or ten (10), then the transfer student shall not be eligible to participate
in an extracurricular activity that is a varsity athletic activity for up to
three hundred sixty-five (365) days.

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that student transfers from public
schools greatly impact public school budgets; that student transfers from
public schools also impact public schools' abilities to appropriately plan
for the upcoming school year, including ensuring staffing needs are met; that
03-17-2025 10:17:16 TNL239

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 S3/17/25 HB1633
if public schools face unexpected student transfers in large numbers, it will
be increasingly difficult for the public schools to appropriately plan and
accommodate student needs for the upcoming school year; that both schools and
students need time to determine participation in and eligibility for
extracurricular activities, particularly for athletic activities; and that
this act is immediately necessary to give students time to assess school
choice options and select the school that best fits their needs while also
providing public schools with enough time to appropriately plan and budget
for the upcoming school year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist,
and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public
peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Brooks

















03-17-2025 10:17:16 TNL239